sl-SI: Vonj nitk v razpršilu: Cvetlični; Sadni; Blag vonj; Brez vonja; Vanilja; Drugo
zh-TW: 噴彩罐氣味: 花香; 果香; 淡香; 無香味; 香草; 其他
ro-RO: Miros al sprayului cu spumă: Floral; Fructe; Miros slab; Fără miros; Vanilie; Altele
en: Spray string scent: Floral; Fruit; Mild scent; Unscented; Vanilla; Other
zh-CN: 喷丝气味: 花香; 果香; 清淡香味; 无味; 香草; 其他
pt-PT: Aroma do fio de spray: Floral; Fruta; Aroma suave; Sem perfume; Baunilha; Outro
it: Profumo della schiuma filante spray: Floreale; Fruttato; Profumo delicato; Inodore; Vaniglia; Altro
fi: Serpentiinisprayn tuoksu: Kukkainen; Hedelmäinen; Mieto tuoksu; Hajusteeton; Vanilja; Muu
ko: 스프레이 스트링 향: 플로럴; 과일; 은은한 향; 무향; 바닐라; 기타
ja: スプレーストリングの香り: フローラル; フルーツ; 微香性; 無香料; バニラ; その他
pt-BR: Serpentina em spray aroma: Floral; Fruta; Aroma suave; Sem perfume; Baunilha; Outro
lt-LT: Purškiamų siūlų kvapas: Gėlių; Vaisių; Švelnus kvapas; Be kvapo; Vanilės; Kita
da: Duft af sprayserpentiner: Blomster; Frugt; Mild duft; Uden duft; Vanilje; Andet
ru: Аромат spray string: Цветочный; Фруктовый; Слабый запах; Без запаха; Ваниль; Другой
cs: Vůně provázku ve spreji: Květinová; Ovocná; Jemná vůně; Bez parfemace; Vanilka; Jiné
de: Duft der Sprühschlangen: Blumig; Fruchtig; Milder Duft; Geruchsneutral; Vanille; Sonstige
pl: Zapach serpentyny w sprayu: Kwiatowy; Owocowy; Łagodny zapach; Bezzapachowy; Waniliowy; Inne
fr: Parfum de la bombe à serpentins: Floral; Fruit; Parfum léger; Sans parfum; Vanille; Autre
nb: Duft i spraytråd: Blomster; Frukt; Mild duft; Uparfymert; Vanilje; Annet
hu: Szerpentinspray illata: Virágos; Gyümölcsös; Enyhe illat; Illatmentes; Vaníliás; Egyéb
el: Άρωμα σπρέι σερπαντίνας: Λουλουδάτο; Φρουτώδες; Ήπιο άρωμα; Χωρίς άρωμα; Βανίλια; Άλλο
es: Arome del aerosol de serpentinas: Floral; Fruta; Olor suave; Sin aroma; Vainilla; Otro
sk-SK: Vôňa spreja: Kvetinová; Ovocná; Jemná vôňa; Bez vône; Vanilková; Iné
tr: Sprey ip koku özelliği: Çiçeksi; Meyveli; Hafif kokulu; Kokusuz; Vanilya; Diğer
th: สเปรย์ กลิ่น: ดอกไม้; ผลไม้; กลิ่นอ่อน; ไม่มีกลิ่น; วานิลลา; อื่นๆ
nl: Serpentinespray geur: Bloemen; Fruit; Milde geur; Geurloos; Vanille; Overige
vi: Mùi hương của dây xịt: Hương hoa; Trái cây; Hương nhẹ; Không mùi; Vani; Khác
hr-HR: Miris u spreju: Cvjetni; Voćni; Blagi miris; Bez mirisa; Vanilija; Ostalo
bg-BG: Аромат на струните, нанесен чрез спрей обработка: Флорален; Плодов; Лек аромат; Без аромат; Ванилия; Друго
sv: Spraysträngens doft: Blommig; Fruktig; Mild doft; Oparfymerad; Vanilj; Övrigt